Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1510
Petroleum, defined.

Petroleum shall mean:

(1) For purposes of the fee provisions of section 66-1521:

(a) Motor vehicle fuel as defined in section 66-482, except natural gasoline used as a denaturant by an ethanol facility as defined in section 66-1333; and

(b) Diesel fuel as defined in section 66-482, including kerosene which has been blended for use as a motor fuel; and

(2) For purposes of all provisions of the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act other than the fee provisions of section 66-1521:

(a) The fuels defined in subdivision (1) of this section; and

(b) A fraction of crude oil that is liquid at a temperature of sixty degrees Fahrenheit and a pressure of fourteen and seven-tenths pounds per square inch absolute, except any such fraction which is regulated as a hazardous substance under section 101(14) of the federal Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, 42 U.S.C. 9601(14), as such act existed on January 1, 2005.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 119;

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 64;

Laws 1997, LB 517, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 65;

Laws 2005, LB 298, § 1.